Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Administrative law judge" means any person appointed by the chief administrative law judge to conduct or preside over hearings as provided in this chapter.

(2) "Hearing" means an adjudicative proceeding within the meaning of RCW 34.05.010(1) conducted by a state agency under RCW 34.05.413 through 34.05.476.

(3) "Office" means the office of administrative hearings.

(4) "State agency" means any state board, commission, department, or officer authorized by law to make rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings, except those in the legislative or judicial branches, the growth management hearings board, the utilities and transportation commission, the pollution control hearings board, the shorelines hearings board, the forest practices appeals board, the *environmental hearings office, the board of industrial insurance appeals, the Washington personnel resources board, the public employment relations commission, and the board of tax appeals.

[ 2010 c 211 s 16; 2002 c 354 s 226; 1995 c 331 s 1; 1994 c 257 s 22; 1993 c 281 s 16; 1989 c 175 s 33; 1982 c 189 s 1; 1981 c 67 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The "environmental hearings office" was renamed the "environmental and land use hearings office" by 2010 c 210 s 4, effective July 1, 2011.

(2) The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—Transfer of power, duties, and functions—2010 c 211: See notes following RCW 36.70A.250.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Severability—1994 c 257: See note following RCW 36.70A.270.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Effective date—1982 c 189: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1982." [ 1982 c 189 s 16.]

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 67: See notes following RCW 34.12.010.